New Jersey, session 222, A4359.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  A taxpayer with a headquarters in New Jersey shall be allowed a credit against the tax due pursuant to section 5 of P.L.1945, c.162 (C.54:10A-5) in an amount equal to 10 percent of the salary and wages paid to each person employed by the taxpayer whose previous employment with another taxpayer was terminated as a result of automation during the immediately preceding privilege period.  In order to qualify for the credit, the taxpayer shall employ the person for at least seven months of the privilege period for which the taxpayer claims the credit.  The credit allowed pursuant to this section shall not exceed $2,500 per employee per privilege period. b.    The order of priority of the application of the credit allowed pursuant to this section and any other credits allowed against the tax imposed pursuant to section 5 of P.L.1945, c.162 (C.54:10A-5) for a privilege period shall be as prescribed by the director. The amount of the credit applied pursuant to this section against the tax imposed pursuant to section 5 of P.L.1945, c.162 (C.54:10A-5) shall not reduce a qualified taxpayers tax liability for a privilege period to an amount less than the statutory minimum provided in subsection (e) of section 5 of P.L.1945, c.162 (C.54:10A-5).  The priority in which credits allowed pursuant to this section and any other credits allowed against the tax imposed pursuant to section 5 of P.L.1945, c.162 (C.54:10A-5) shall be as determined by the director.  The amount of the credit otherwise allowable under this section which cannot be applied for the privilege period due to the limitations of this subsection may be carried over, if necessary, to the seven privilege periods following the privilege period for which the credit was allowed. c.    As used in this section, automation means a device, process, or system that functions without continuous input from a human operator. 2.    a.  A taxpayer with a headquarters in New Jersey shall be allowed a credit against the New Jersey Gross Income Tax Act, N.J.S.54A:1-1 et seq., in an amount equal to 10 percent of the salary and wages paid to each person employed by the taxpayer whose previous employment with another taxpayer was terminated as a result of automation during the immediately preceding taxable year.  In order to qualify for the credit, the taxpayer shall employ the person for at least seven months of the taxable year for which the taxpayer claims the credit.  The credit allowed pursuant to this section shall not exceed $2,500 per qualifying employee per taxable year. b.    The order of priority of the application of the credit allowed pursuant to this section and any other credits allowed against the tax imposed pursuant to N.J.S.54A:1-1 et seq. for a taxable year shall be as prescribed by the director.  The amount of the credit applied pursuant to this section against the tax imposed pursuant to N.J.S.54A:1-1 et seq. shall not reduce a taxpayers tax liability for a taxable year to an amount less than zero.  The amount of the tax credit otherwise allowable under this section which cannot be applied for the taxable year due to the limitations of this subsection may be carried forward, if necessary, to the seven taxable years following the taxable year for which the tax credit was allowed. c.    (1) A business entity that is classified as a partnership for federal income tax purposes shall not be allowed a credit under this section directly, but the amount of credit of a taxpayer in respect of a distributive share of partnership income under the "New Jersey Gross Income Tax Act," N.J.S.54A:1-1 et seq., shall be determined by allocating to the taxpayer that proportion of the credit acquired by the partnership that is equal to the taxpayer's share, whether or not distributed, of the total distributive income or gain of the partnership for its taxable year ending within or with the taxpayer's taxable year. (2) A New Jersey S Corporation shall not be allowed a credit under this section directly, but the amount of the tax credit of a taxpayer in respect of a pro rata share of S Corporation income, shall be determined by allocating to the taxpayer that proportion of the tax credit acquired by the New Jersey S Corporation that is equal to the taxpayer's share, whether or not distributed, of the total pro rata share of S Corporation income of the New Jersey S Corporation for its privilege period ending within or with the taxpayer's taxable year. d.    As used in this section, automation means a device, process, or system that replaces human labor and functions without continuous input from an operator. 3.    This act shall take effect immediately and shall apply to privilege periods and taxable years beginning on or after January 1 of the year next following the date of enactment.